Maryland, session 2025, SB0082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0082*

SENATE BILL 82
Article – Education
7–205.1.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection[, beginning in the
2023–2024 school year] AND § 7–213 OF THIS SUBTITLE, each county board shall provide
all students who meet the CCR standard required under subsection (c) of this section with
access to the following post college and career readiness (post–CCR) pathways, at no cost
to the student or the student’s parents, including the cost of any fees:
(i) A competitive entry college preparatory program, chosen by the
county board, consisting of:
1. The International Baccalaureate Diploma Program;
2. The Cambridge AICE Diploma Program; or
3. A comparable program consisting of Advanced Placement
courses specified by the College Board;
(ii) A program that allows a student, through an early college
program or dual enrollment at a student’s high school and an institution of higher
education to earn:
1. An associate degree; or
2. At least 60 credits toward a bachelor’s degree; and
(iii) A robust set of career and technology education programs that
are recommended by the CTE Skills Standards Advisory Committee and approved by the
CTE Committee and that allow students to complete:
1. A credit or noncredit certificate or license program, course,
or sequence of courses, including a program, course, or courses taken through dual
enrollment under § 15–127 of this article, at a secondary or postsecondary institution,
through an Advanced Placement course at a secondary institution, or through an
apprenticeship sponsor that leads to an industry recognized occupational–credential or
postsecondary certificate;
2. A registered apprenticeship program approved by the
Division of Workforce Development and Adult Learning within the Maryland Department
of Labor; or
3. A youth apprenticeship program, under Title 18, Subtitle
18 of this article.

SENATE BILL 82 3
(4) To phase in expansion of dual enrollment to maximize the number of
students who can earn the maximum number of dual enrollment credits consistent with
the phased increases in school funding, for fiscal years 2025 through 2027, the State Board
and the Accountability and Implementation Board, in consultation with each local school
system, may limit the number and types of courses that a student dually enrolled at the
student’s public high school and at an institution of higher education may enroll in during
the school year at the institution of higher education as part of the post–CCR pathway in
accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection and § 15–127 of this article.
7–213.
A COUNTY BOARD MAY NOT CHARGE A STUDENT OR A STUDENT’S PARENTS
ANY FEES RELATED TO THE ENROLLMENT IN OR COMPLETION OF:
(1) THE INTERNATIONAL BACCALAUREATE DIPLOMA PROGRAM; OR
(2) A COMPARABLE PROGRAM CONSISTING OF ADVANCED
PLACEMENT COURSES SPECIFIED BY THE COLLEGE BOARD.
15–101.
(a) Each public institution of higher education shall accept for admission any
graduate of an approved public high school:
(1) Who is certified by [his] THE high school principal, based on standards
of the State Board of Education, as qualified to pursue a course of study at the institution;
or
(2) Who meets the admission standards of the institution.
(b) (1) Each public institution of higher education may accept, for special
admission any student who has:
(i) Completed the seventh grade; and
(ii) A scholastic aptitude test combined score of 1,200 or an
equivalent score on a nationally accepted college entrance examination.
(2) This subsection does not affect the State or local share of aid provided
pursuant to § 5–202 of this article to the secondary school in which the student is enrolled.
(C) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY NOT CHARGE A
GRADUATE OF AN APPROVED PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN THE STATE ANY FEES
ASSOCIATED WITH AN APPLICATION FOR ADMISSION AT THE INSTITUTION.

SENATE BILL 82
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.